verbo/irregulares/irregulares_2.lexc
!!! Irregular verbs.  !!!
!!! Conjugación de los verbos irregulares. !!!
!!! group: o - ue !!!

LEXICON Root

Irregulares_2;

LEXICON Irregulares_2
    
volver #;
soñar #;
torcer #;
encontrar #;
moverse #;
acostarse #;
almorzar #;
aprobar #;
costar #;
sonar #;
recordar #;
rodar #;
soler #;
cocer #;
probar #;
demostrar #;
